Wyoming, session 2025, HB0087.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-24-201, 9-24-204 and 9-24-205,
9-24-301 through 9-24-303 and 9-24-501 are created to read:

ARTICLE 2
IN GENERAL

9-24-201. Definitions.
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(a) As used in this chapter unless otherwise defined:

(i) "Commission" means the Wyoming gaming
commission;

(ii) "Director" means the executive director of
the Wyoming gaming commission;

(iii) "Gaming activity" means all gaming
activities provided for and regulated by this chapter;

(iv) "Net proceeds" means all revenue less the
payment to the player.

9-24-204. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; personal or private interest; compensation;
records.

(a) The commission shall annually elect from its
membership a president and vice-president, and may employ a
director who has a working knowledge of pari-mutuel
betting, horse racing and other forms of gaming regulated
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
by the commission or an executive secretary, or both. The
director and executive secretary may be retained on a
yearly basis or for the racing season only as determined by
the commission. Salary for the director and executive
secretary shall be determined by the commission with the
consent of the personnel division. The commission may also
employ other personnel required to carry out this act.

(b) The commission shall hold an annual fall meeting
in Wyoming and shall hold special meetings at such times
and places within Wyoming as the majority of the members
determine. A majority of the commission constitutes a
quorum and a majority vote of a quorum may act for the
commission. The commission shall keep a record of the
proceedings of the commission which is open at all times
for public inspection. Legislative liaisons shall be
considered members of the governing body of the commission
for purposes of attending executive sessions held pursuant
to W.S. 16-4-405(a) only.

(c) Any member of the commission who has a personal
or private interest in any matter proposed or pending
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
before the commission shall publicly disclose this fact to
the commission and shall not vote on the matter.

(d) The members of the commission shall receive per
diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), and
compensation of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day during
which they are actually engaged in the discharge of their
duties.

9-24-205. Supervision of gaming activities;
rulemaking; prosecution.

(a) The commission shall:

(i) Supervise the conduct of all gaming
activities provided for and regulated by this chapter;

(ii) Administer title 6, chapter 7, article 1 of
the Wyoming statutes;

(iii) Access criminal history record information
for all employees who supervise the conduct of gaming
activities or administer and enforce title 6, chapter 7,
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
article 1 of the Wyoming statutes, subject to W.S.
9-1-627(d).

(b) The commission may make reasonable rules for the
control, supervision and direction of applicants,
permittees and licensees under this chapter.

(c) The attorney general may, at the request of the
department, act on behalf of the commission to prosecute
criminal actions under W.S. 6-7-101 through 6-7-104 and
9-24-401 through 9-24-407 if after a thorough investigation
the action is deemed advisable by the attorney general.

ARTICLE 3
CHARITABLE GAMING

9-24-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Calcutta wagering" means wagering on the
outcome of amateur contests, cutter horse racing, dog sled
racing, professional rodeo events or professional golf
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
tournaments in which those who wager bid at auction for the
exclusive right to "purchase" or wager upon a particular
contestant or entrant in the event and when the outcome of
the event has been decided the total wagers comprising the
pool, less a percentage "take-out" by the event's sponsor,
is distributed to those who "purchased" or wagered upon the
winning contestants or entrants;

(ii) "Charitable or nonprofit organization"
means an organization recognized as a charitable or
nonprofit organization under Wyoming statutes and which
possesses a valid exemption from federal income tax issued
by the Internal Revenue Service under the provisions of 26
U.S.C. § 501(c) and political parties organized under the
law of Wyoming and exempt from federal income tax issued by
the Internal Revenue Service under the provisions of 26
U.S.C. § 527.

9-24-302. Bingo games and pull tab games.

(a) The commission shall regulate bingo games and
pull tab games.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(b) Bingo games shall only be conducted and pull tab
games shall only be sold in accordance with this section by
charitable or nonprofit organizations that have been in
existence in this state for not less than three (3) years
and that are licensed under this section.

(c) A charitable or nonprofit organization applying
for a license under this section shall do so on a uniform
application furnished by the commission. The commission
shall not charge applicants any fee and shall not require
any fee for any license issued under this section.

(d) Any person required to be licensed under this
section shall file an annual report with the commission as
specified by rule.

(e) Bingo games and pull tab games authorized under
this section shall be subject to the following:

(i) Tickets for bingo games shall be sold only
in this state;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(ii) Pull tab games shall be sold only on the
premises owned or occupied by the charitable or nonprofit
organization licensed under this section;

(iii) In conducting bingo games and pull tab
games the charitable or nonprofit organization shall use
only volunteers who are bona fide members of the charitable
or nonprofit organization or employees or contractors who
are paid by the charitable or nonprofit organization to
assist in the operation of the game;

(iv) Players of bingo games or pull tab games
shall be eighteen (18) years or older;

(v) Not less than sixty-five percent (65%) of
all gross sales of bingo games and pull tab games shall be
redeemed as winnings each month. The net proceeds after
payment of winnings shall be restricted as follows:

(A) Not more than forty percent (40%) of
net proceeds shall be paid to distributors or manufacturers
of supplies or equipment necessary to conduct the game; and

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(B) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the net
proceeds remaining after payment for all costs and supplies
shall be donated within one (1) year by the organization to
a bona fide charitable or benevolent purpose.

(vi) The charitable or nonprofit organization
conducting the bingo game or pull tab game may purchase
supplies or equipment necessary to conduct the game from a
distributor or manufacturer at a price based on a per card
or pull tab basis subject to the limitations provided in
subparagraph (v)(A) of this subsection.

9-24-303. Calcutta wagering.

(a) The commission shall regulate calcutta wagering
on contests and events.

(b) Calcutta wagering on contests or events shall
only be conducted by bona fide nationally chartered
veterans', religious, charitable, educational or fraternal
organizations and nonprofit local civic or service clubs
organized or incorporated under the laws of this state and
that are licensed under this section.
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(c) An organization or club applying for a license
under this section shall do so on a uniform application
furnished by the commission. The commission shall not
charge applicants any fee and shall not require any fee for
any license issued under this section.

(d) Any person required to be licensed under this
section shall file an annual report with the commission as
specified by rule.

(e) Calcutta wagering on contests or events
authorized under this section shall be subject to the
following:

(i) The contest or event shall be conducted
solely in this state;

(ii) Any rules affecting the contest or
requirements for participants shall be clearly posted;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(iii) The total prizes or prize money paid out
in any one (1) contest or event shall not exceed ninety
percent (90%) of the total wagers;

(iv) A minimum of ten percent (10%) of the total
wagers on each contest or event shall be donated within one
(1) year by the sponsoring organization or club to a bona
fide charitable or benevolent purpose;

(v) No separate organization, club or
professional person shall be employed to conduct the
contest or event or assist therein;

(vi) Thirty (30) days written notice of the time
and place of a contest or event shall be provided to the
governing body of the county or municipality in which the
organization or club intends to conduct the contest or
event. No contest or event shall be conducted if the
governing body passes a resolution objecting thereto;

(vii) The sponsoring organization or club shall
comply with the relevant sections of the internal revenue
code of 1954, as amended, relating to taxes on wagering;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(viii) Persons wagering on calcutta contests or
events shall be eighteen (18) years or older.

ARTICLE 5
SKILL BASED AMUSEMENT GAMES

9-24-501. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Establishment" means a single physical
place of business that operates as a truck stop, smoke shop
or that is licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic liquor
or malt beverages under W.S. 12-2-203(g), 12-4-201,
12-4-301, 12-4-401, 12-4-407, 12-4-413, 12-4-414 or
12-4-415;

(ii) "Operator" means a person who possesses and
operates an establishment where skill based amusement games
may be played for profit;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(iii) "Skill" means a player's knowledge,
dexterity or any other ability or expertise relevant to
game play;

(iv) "Skill based amusement game" means a game
played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or
other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical
gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player,
determined by an individual's level of strategy and skill,
rather than any inherent element of chance, is the primary
factor in determining the outcome and for which the player
may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a
successful outcome. "Skill based amusement game" shall not
include any game played for prizes of nominal value as
provided by rule of the commission;

(v) "Smoke shop" means a retailer as defined in
W.S. 14-3-301(a)(iii) that derives fifty percent (50%) or
more of its gross annual revenue from nicotine products as
defined by W.S. 14-3-301(a)(vi);

(vi) "Truck stop" means a business premises that
is:
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(A) Equipped with diesel islands used for
fueling commercial motor vehicles and that sells on average
one hundred twenty-five thousand (125,000) gallons of
diesel or biodiesel fuel each month based on the previous
twelve (12) months of sales; and

(B) Located on a parcel of land of not less
than two (2) acres that is either owned or leased by the
business and which includes a convenience store with
parking spaces dedicated to commercial motor vehicle use.

(vii) "Vendor" means a person who owns and
distributes a skill based amusement game to an operator for
profit.

Section 2. W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(M), 7-19-201(a)(vi),
33-1-202(a)(i) and (ii)(intro), 33-1-301(a),
33-1-302(a)(intro) and (vii), 33-1-303(a)(intro) and
33-1-304(a)(intro), (c)(intro) and (e) are amended to read:

6-7-101. Definitions.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(a) As used in this article:

(iii) "Gambling" means risking any property for
gain contingent in whole or in part upon lot, chance, the
operation of a gambling device or the happening or outcome
of an event, including a sporting event, over which the
person taking a risk has no control, but does not include
any of the following:

(M) Activities authorized by the Wyoming
gaming commission under title 11, chapter 25 title 9,
chapter 24 of the Wyoming statutes;

7-19-201. State or national criminal history record
information.

(a) The following persons shall be required to submit
to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national
criminal history record information:

(vi) Persons applying for a permit or license
under W.S. 11-25-104(f) or if required under W.S.
11-25-104(k) title 9, chapter 24 of the Wyoming statutes;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

33-1-202. Disposition of fees and interest.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by
statute:

(i) All fees and monies received and collected
by the boards or commissions under this title and under
W.S. 11-25-201(d) 9-24-403(d), 21-2-802(d) and 23-2-414(d)
shall be deposited into the state treasury and credited to
each board's or commission's respective account as created
by statute;

(ii) The interest on all fees and monies
collected by the boards or commissions under this title and
under W.S. 11-25-201(d) 9-24-403(d), 21-2-802(d) and
23-2-414(d) shall be credited as follows:

33-1-301. Purpose and scope.

(a) The purpose of this article is to establish
procedures for the operation of boards authorized to
establish examination, inspection, permit or license fees
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
for any profession or occupation regulated under this title
or under W.S. 11-25-201 9-24-403, 21-2-802 and 23-2-414.

33-1-302. Duties of licensure boards.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by
statute, a board authorized to establish examination,
inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or
occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.
11-25-201 9-24-403, 21-2-802 or 23-2-414 shall:

(vii) Compensate each member for per diem and
mileage for attending and traveling to and from meetings,
hearings and other activities necessary in the performance
of the duties of the office in the same manner and amount
as members of the Wyoming legislature. Members who are
state employees that receive compensation from their
employers for activities performed pursuant to this title
or under W.S. 11-25-201 9-24-403, 21-2-802 or 23-2-414
shall not receive additional compensation but shall receive
mileage and per diem as provided under this paragraph if
they are not reimbursed by their employers;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
33-1-303. Powers of licensure boards.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by
statute, a board authorized to establish examination,
inspection, permit or license fees for any profession or
occupation regulated under this title or under W.S.
11-25-201 9-24-403, 21-2-802 or 23-2-414 may:

33-1-304. Considering criminal convictions;
pre-application determinations.

(a) Except as specifically required by its licensure,
certification or registration statutes, every board,
commission, commissioner or authority authorized to
establish examination, inspection, permit, license,
certification or registration requirements or fees for any
profession or occupation regulated under this title or
under W.S. 7-4-211, 11-25-201 9-24-403, 15-5-103, 17-4-406,
21-2-802, 23-2-414, 26-4-101 or 40-22-109 and who considers
criminal convictions as part of its regulatory duties shall
not consider prior convictions that do not affect the
practice of the profession or occupation or the ability to
practice the profession or occupation regulated by the
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
board, commission, commissioner or authority. Specifically,
the board, commission, commissioner or authority may cite
as state policy the following:

(c) No board, commission, commissioner or authority
authorized to regulate through licensure, certification or
registration a profession or occupation under this title,
or under W.S. 7-4-211, 11-25-201 9-24-403, 15-5-103,
17-4-406, 21-2-802, 23-2-414, 26-4-101 or 40-22-109, shall
consider evidence of any conviction more than twenty (20)
years old, or for a lesser period of time if expressly
provided by statute, when analyzing a person's criminal
history pursuant to the board's, commission's,
commissioner's or authority's regulatory duties, except
when:

(e) Any person who has been previously convicted of a
crime may at any time apply to a board, commission,
commissioner or authority authorized to establish
examination, inspection, permit, license, certification or
registration requirements for any profession or occupation
regulated under this title or under W.S. 7-4-211, 11-25-201
9-24-403, 15-5-103, 17-4-406, 21-2-802, 23-2-414, 26-4-101
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
or 40-22-103 for a determination as to whether one (1) or
more of the person's criminal convictions will prevent the
person from receiving a license, certification or
registration. Each board, commission, commissioner or
authority may by rule establish a procedure by which an
application submitted under this subsection is reviewed and
may by rule delegate the authority to review an application
to a staff member of the board, commission, commissioner or
authority. A board, commission, commissioner or authority
may request criminal history background information for
purposes of reviewing an application under this subsection
in accordance with W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxxix). The board,
commission, commissioner or authority may by rule establish
and charge a reasonable fee to recover the costs of
researching and developing a determination under this
subsection, provided that any fee shall not exceed the
costs of providing the determination under this subsection.
A determination made by a board, commission, commissioner
or authority under this subsection shall not be binding
upon the board, commission, commissioner or authority.

Section 3. W.S. 11-25-102 as 9-24-401, 11-25-104 as
9-24-402, 11-25-208 as 9-24-410, 11-25-305 as 9-24-506,
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
9-24-101 through 9-24-103 as 9-24-601 through 9-24-603 and
9-24-106 as 9-24-606 are amended and renumbered to read:

ARTICLE 4
PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING

11-25-102 9-24-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Breeder award" means monies collected
pursuant to W.S. 11-25-201(j) 9-24-403(j) and distributed
by the commission to promote the improved breeding and
development of the horse industry in Wyoming. Breeder
awards may include purse enhancement of Wyoming bred races;

(ii) "Commission" means the Wyoming gaming
commission;

(iii) "Drug" means any substance foreign to a
horse's body as prescribed by the commission;

(iv) "Event" means a pari-mutuel event;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(v) "Pari-mutuel event" means the events which
are authorized by the commission for the conduct of horse
racing (to include quarter horse, thoroughbred or other
approved races), harness racing, cutter racing, chariot
racing, chuckwagon racing, professional roping and rodeo
events and simulcasting of dog racing and the events
described in this paragraph as prescribed by the
commission. Notwithstanding W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iv) and
11-25-203 9-24-405, the commission may authorize and
promulgate rules providing for pari-mutuel wagering on
events that have previously occurred, utilizing an
electronic system or device that affords an opportunity for
the exercise of skill or judgment where the outcome is not
completely controlled by chance alone;

(vi) "Pari-mutuel wagering" means wagering on
the outcome of pari-mutuel events in which those who wager
purchase tickets of various denominations on entrants in
the events and all wagers for each event are pooled and
held by the permittee for distribution, and when the
outcome of the event has been decided, the permittee
distributes the total wagers comprising the pool, less an
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
amount not greater than twenty-five and nine-tenths percent
(25.90%) for live racing and in the event of simulcasting
an amount not to exceed the percentage allowed at the host
track or thirty-five percent (35%), whichever is less and
less the amount for breakage to holders of tickets on the
winning entries;

(vii) "Simulcasting" means the sale of
pari-mutuel pools electronically transmitted live or
historic on interstate or intrastate pari-mutuel events as
prescribed by the commission. The commission shall
authorize simulcasting subject to the following conditions:

(A) Simulcasting may shall be conducted
only by a holder of a permit to simulcast issued under this
act. The permit shall be authorized by the commission for
a period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of
issuance. The commissioners shall issue a simulcast permit
only to an applicant authorized under this act to conduct a
pari-mutuel event other than simulcasting;

(B) Simulcasting may shall be conducted off
the permitted premises only if the board of county
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
commissioners of the county in which such simulcasting will
be conducted grants its approval;

(C) No simulcasting may shall be conducted
within one hundred (100) miles of any premises permitted
under this act, except that the commission may waive the
one hundred (100) mile limitation if the simulcast permit
application includes written approval from the permittee
whose permitted premises is within the one hundred (100)
mile limitation;

(D) The commission shall promulgate rules
for conducting simulcasting as are reasonably necessary to
protect the public interest.

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 11-25-101 through
11-25-306 this article;

(ix) "Multiple wagering" means wagers which
consist of a single betting interest on two (2) entries;

(x) "Exotic wagering" means wagers which consist
of a single betting interest on three (3) or more entries;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(xi) "Advance deposit pari-mutuel wager" means a
wager in which a person who has opened an account in
advance with a licensee can place wagers from this account
in person, by telephone or other electronic means;

(xii) "Horsemen's association" means the
association that represents the majority of the owners and
trainers licensed by the commission to race horses at an
event;

(xiii) "Out-of-state simulcast facility" means a
track or other facility, located within a jurisdiction
other than Wyoming, at which pari-mutuel wagers are placed,
accepted or distributed, either in person or
electronically, on simulcast races pursuant to proper
authorization under the laws of that jurisdiction;

(xiv) "Source market fee" means a license fee,
assessed by the commission pursuant to W.S. 11-25-201(m)
9-24-403(m), payable by out-of-state simulcast facilities
that conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races and
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
that accept wagers from Wyoming residents by telephone or
other electronic means at those facilities;

(xv) "Net proceeds" means all revenue less the
payment to the player;

(xvi) "Establishment" means a single physical
place of business that operates as a truck stop, smoke shop
or that is licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic liquor
or malt beverages under W.S. 12-2-203(g), 12-4-201,
12-4-301, 12-4-401, 12-4-407, 12-4-413, 12-4-414 or
12-4-415;

(xvii) "Operator" means a person who possesses
and operates an establishment where skill based amusement
games may be played for profit;

(xviii) "Skill" means a player's knowledge,
dexterity or any other ability or expertise relevant to
game play;

(xix) "Skill based amusement game" means a game
played in exchange for consideration of cash, credit or
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
other thing of value on a fixed, commercial electrical
gaming device in which the bona fide skill of the player,
determined by an individual's level of strategy and skill,
rather than any inherent element of chance, is the primary
factor in determining the outcome and for which the player
may be awarded a prize or other thing of value for a
successful outcome. "Skill based amusement game" shall not
include any game played for prizes of nominal value as
provided by rule of the commission;

(xx) "Vendor" means a person who owns and
distributes a skill based amusement game to an operator for
profit;

(xxi) "Truck stop" means a business premises
that is:

(A) Equipped with diesel islands used for
fueling commercial motor vehicles and that sells on average
one hundred twenty-five thousand (125,000) gallons of
diesel or biodiesel fuel each month based on the previous
twelve (12) months of sales; and

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(B) Located on a parcel of land of not less
than two (2) acres that is either owned or leased by the
business and which includes a convenience store with
parking spaces dedicated to commercial motor vehicle use.

(xxii) "Smoke shop" means a retailer as defined
in W.S. 14-3-301(a)(iii) that derives fifty percent (50%)
or more of its gross annual revenue from nicotine products
as defined by W.S. 14-3-301(a)(vi).

11-25-104 9-24-402. Financial interest in events;
licenses generally; rulemaking.

(a) The commission shall annually elect from its
membership a president and vice-president, and may employ a
director who has a working knowledge of pari-mutuel
betting, horse racing and other forms of gaming regulated
by the commission or an executive secretary, or both. The
director may be retained on a yearly basis or for the
racing season only as determined by the commission. Salary
for the director or executive secretary shall be determined
by the commission with the consent of the personnel
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
division. The commission may also employ other personnel
required to carry out this act.

(b) The commission shall hold an annual fall meeting
in Wyoming and shall hold special meetings at such times
and places within Wyoming as the majority of the members
determine. A majority of the commission constitutes a
quorum and a majority vote of a quorum may act for the
commission. The secretary of the commission shall keep a
record of the proceedings of the commission which is open
at all times for public inspection. Legislative liaisons
shall be considered members of the governing body of the
commission for purposes of attending executive sessions
held pursuant to W.S. 16-4-405(a) only.

(c) Any member of the commission who has a personal
or private interest in any matter proposed or pending
before the commission shall publicly disclose this fact to
the commission and shall not vote on the matter.

(d) Any member of the commission who owns or has any
interest, or whose spouse or member of his immediate family
has any interest, in any activity pari-mutuel event
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
regulated by the commission or in an animal participating
in a pari-mutuel event shall disclose that interest and
shall not participate in any commission decision involving
a protest regarding that activity or occurring at that
pari-mutuel event.

(e) The commission may authorize by license or permit
and supervise all the conduct of all events provided for
and regulated by this act. The commission may make
reasonable rules for the control, supervision and direction
of applicants, permittees and licensees. The rules shall
include procedures for resolving scheduling conflicts and
settling disputes between permittees, for the supervising,
disciplining, suspending, fining and barring from
pari-mutuel events of all persons required to be licensed
or permitted by this act, and for the holding, conducting
and operating of all pari-mutuel events pursuant to this
act. The rules shall include requirements for internal
controls for all aspects of pari-mutuel wagering, including
procedures for system integrity, system security,
operations and accounting. The commission may require that
license applicants be fingerprinted for identification
purposes as a condition of licensing. The commission shall
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
announce the place, time and duration of pari-mutuel events
for which license or permit fees shall be required and
establish reasonable fees for all licenses and permits
provided for by this act. The fees shall be established to
ensure that the costs of administering this act are
recovered through the total revenues received under this
act. The commission shall establish security access
safeguards for licensees to use for advance deposit
pari-mutuel wagering. The commission shall prohibit advance
deposit pari-mutuel advertising that it determines to be
deceptive to the public.

(f) Each permittee, licensee, any current and
prospective employee, volunteer and contract employee of a
permittee or licensee and each person who has access to
restricted areas or animals housed on permitted event
grounds for horse racing or for pari-mutuel activities
shall be licensed by the commission and shall comply with
all rules and regulations and all orders issued by the
commission. No person shall hold any event with pari-mutuel
wagering without obtaining a permit. The commission may
require that all permittees, licensees, current and
prospective employees, volunteers and contract employees of
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
a permittee or licensee and each person who has access to
restricted areas or animals housed on permitted event
grounds for horse racing or for pari-mutuel activities
submit fingerprints to the Wyoming division of criminal
investigation to perform a criminal history background
check pursuant to W.S. 7-19-201 in order to obtain state
and national criminal history record information. The
division may share the results of the criminal history
background check with the commission pursuant to W.S.
7-19-106(a)(xxxv). For purposes of this subsection,
permittees, licensees, current and prospective employees,
volunteers and contract employees of a permittee or
licensee, shall include the following as defined:

(i) "Assistant starter" means a person who
handles a horse in the starting gate on race day and during
training;

(ii) "Assistant trainer" means a person who is
designated by the trainer to make decisions on behalf of
the trainer during the trainer's absence;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(iii) "Clerk of scales" means a person whose
primary responsibility is to weigh the riders before and
after a race to ensure proper weight is carried;

(iv) "Commission or permittee employee" means a
person who is an employee that by virtue of their required
employment duties has access to restricted areas of the
permitted event grounds or has access to information that
is limited by law or confidential in nature and could
effectuate or manipulate wagering activity or wagering
information;

(v) "Commission safety officer" means a person
who is employed by the commission to monitor activities and
practices in the stable area, barn area and on the
racetrack for compliance with this act and rules of the
commission;

(vi) "Commission veterinarian" means a Wyoming
licensed veterinarian hired directly by the commission;

(vii) "Exercise rider" means a person who
exercises a horse during a training session;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(viii) "Farrier" means a person who provides
hoof care, including the trimming and balancing of horses
hooves and placing of shoes on hooves, if necessary;

(ix) "Groom" means a person who cleans stalls,
bathes, brushes and provides general care to a race horse;

(x) "Horseman's bookkeeper" means a person whose
primary responsibility is to keep and preserve books which
will that reflect the deposits or other credits and
withdrawals or other charges that may be made by an owner
or other licensee;

(xi) "Host facility" means a person who leases
their property to a permitholder to operate or host
pari-mutuel wagering;

(xii) "Identifier" means a person who verifies
the identity of each race horse prior to the race;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(xiii) "Jockey" means a person who is a race
rider of a horse, including a licensed jockey or an
apprentice jockey;

(xiv) "Jockey agent" means a person who handles
the daily business of a jockey or apprentice;

(xv) "Mutuel employee" means a person who acts
under the direction of the mutuel managers and sells
betting tickets;

(xvi) "Mutuel manager" means a person who is an
employee of the permittee who manages the mutuel department
overseeing all wagering activity;

(xvii) "Owner" means a person who is the owner,
part owner or lessee of a horse;

(xviii) "Paddock judge" means a person who is
responsible for the paddock area and saddling routine of
the race horses;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(xix) "Pari-mutuel service provider" means any
business or person providing goods or services to a
pari-mutuel permitholder who is required to have access to
designated and secured areas of the pari-mutuel event or
provides direct services for the support of players or
wagering terminals;

(xx) "Patrol judge" means a person who observes
the progress of a race from various vantage points around
the track;

(xxi) "Permitholder" means a person or entity
holding a permit issued by the Wyoming gaming commission to
operate a pari-mutuel facility;

(xxii) "Permittee official" means any mutuel
manager, steward, events judge, placing judge, patrol
judge, paddock judge, clerk of scale, identifier, starter,
horsemen bookkeeper, track safety officer, racing secretary
and track superintendent who by virtue of their position
has unrestricted access to the pari-mutuel event grounds
and animals participating;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(xxiii) "Placing judge" means a person who posts
the order of finish in a race;

(xxiv) "Pony rider" means a person that rides a
horse while leading another race horse, either during a
training session or escorting the race horse to the post on
race days;

(xxv) "Private practice veterinarian" means a
Wyoming licensed veterinarian hired to provide services to
owners and trainers;

(xxvi) "Racing secretary" means a person who
drafts conditions of races and assigns weights for handicap
events;

(xxvii) "Security employee" means a person who
is responsible for the protection of property, and people,
acting in accordance with the permittee's guidelines;

(xxviii) "Service provider employee" means a
person who is an employee of the pari-mutuel service
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
providers who provide provides additional support to the
vendor;

(xxix) "Starter" means a person who is
responsible for the official dispatching of horses for a
race;

(xxx) "Steward" or "event judge" means a person
who is the head event official, or their designee, charged
with the duty of making sure the events comply with this
act and the rules of the commission;

(xxxi) "Track safety officer" means a person who
monitors the paddock and racetrack areas during all
training and racing hours for safety related issues;

(xxxii) "Track superintendent" means a person
who is responsible for all track maintenance, ensuring that
the track surface is properly groomed and prepared for
training and racing hours;

(xxxiii) "Trainer" means a person who is engaged
in the training of race horses;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(xxxiv) "Valet" means a person who assists in
the saddling of horses for the jockeys in a pari-mutuel
event;

(xxxv) "Veterinarian assistant" means a person
who is hired by a commission veterinarian or a private
practice veterinarian to assist in providing veterinarian
services under the direct supervision of a licensed
veterinarian.

(g) The commission may delegate authority to enforce
rules of the commission and this act to three (3) stewards
at each pari-mutuel event, at least one (1) of whom shall
be an employee of and selected by the commission. The
commission shall require at least one (1) steward to
supervise each simulcast location that is approved by the
commission. Stewards shall exercise such reasonable and
necessary authority as is designated by rules of the
commission including the following:

(i) Enforce rules of the commission and this
act;
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(ii) Rule on the outcome of events;

(iii) Levy fines not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00) for violations of rules of the
commission. Violations shall be reported daily and fines
shall be paid to the commission within forty-eight (48)
hours of imposition and notice;

(iv) Suspend licenses not to exceed thirty (30)
calendar days for violations of rules of the commission.
Suspensions shall be reported to the commission daily;

(v) Recommend that the commission impose fines
or suspensions greater than permitted by paragraphs (iii)
and (iv) of this subsection.

(h) Only a licensed steward of the permitted event
may impose fines or license suspensions except that a
starter may impose fines when horses arrive at the gate
until off time in an amount not exceeding two hundred
dollars ($200.00).

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(j) Any fine or license suspension imposed by a
steward or fine imposed by a starter may be appealed in
writing to the commission within five (5) days after its
imposition. The commission may affirm or reverse the
decision of a steward or starter or may increase or
decrease any fine or suspension. A fine imposed by the
commission shall not exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000.00). Suspensions of a license may be for any
period of time, but shall be commensurate with the
seriousness of the offense.

(k) The commission shall access criminal history
record information for all operators and vendors under
article 3 of this chapter and all licensees, permittees and
employees of the commission under W.S. 9-1-627(d) for the
purposes of this act. Every applicant for a permit or
license under this act shall provide the commission
fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal
history record background check as provided under W.S.
7-19-201.

(m) The commission shall establish the number of
actual live horse racing or pari-mutuel event days required
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
to qualify for a simulcasting permit. The commission shall
adopt rules governing establishment of live horse racing or
pari-mutuel event days required for a simulcasting permit
in a manner that ensures fair and equitable involvement of
all affected parties, including consideration of the
economic viability of those days to permit applicants.

(n) Commencing July 1, 2020, any person conducting an
activity as specified by W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iii)(D) or (F)
shall first obtain a license from the commission. Under
this subsection, the commission shall not charge license
applicants any fee and shall not require any fee for any
license issued. Any person required to be licensed under
this subsection shall file an annual report with the
commission as specified by rule.

(o) In addition to all other duties, the commission,
in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall:

(i) Enforce W.S. 6-7-101 through 6-7-104;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(ii) Regulate online sports wagering and sports
wagering operators and vendors under W.S. 9-24-101 through
9-24-106.

11-25-208 9-24-410. Penalties.

(a) Any person holding or conducting any pari-mutuel
event in connection with the pari-mutuel system of wagering
without a permit issued in accordance with this act, or any
person who violates any other provision of this act is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for not more
than six (6) months, or both.

(b) The attorney general may, at the request of the
commission, act on behalf of the commission to prosecute
criminal actions under this chapter or title 6, chapter 7,
article 1 of the Wyoming statutes if after a thorough
investigation the action is deemed advisable by the
attorney general.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
11-25-305 9-24-506. Operator permit, vendor license
and skill based amusement game decal approval; criteria;
review.

(a) The commission shall, not more than sixty (60)
days after the date of receipt of an application or
application for renewal for an operator permit, vendor
license or skill based amusement game decal under W.S.
11-25-304 9-24-505 either:

(i) Issue the permit, license or decal; or

(ii) Deny the application based on the grounds
that the applicant failed to qualify as provided by
subsection (b) of this section.

(b) The commission shall deny any application under
this article upon finding any of the following:

(i) The applicant has been convicted of,
forfeited bail on or pleaded guilty within ten (10) years
before the date of filing the application to:

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(A) A crime involving theft, dishonesty or
fraud;

(B) Bribery or unlawfully influencing a
public official;

(C) A felony involving physical harm to an
individual; or

(D) Any other crime identified by
commission rules that negatively impacts the applicant's
credibility or the security, integrity or fairness of play
of skill based amusement games operated by the applicant.

(ii) The applicant tampered with submitted
documentation or concealed, failed to disclose or otherwise
attempted to mislead the commission with respect to any
material fact contained in the application or contained in
any other information required of or submitted by an
applicant to the commission;

(iii) The applicant failed or refused to
cooperate in the investigation of a crime relating to
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
gambling, corruption of a public official or any organized
criminal activity;

(iv) The applicant failed to otherwise meet the
requirements imposed under this article.

(c) Operators shall have a continuing duty to
disclose in writing any material change in the information
provided in the application to the commission, including:

(i) Changes to names and contact information;

(ii) Arrests, convictions, guilty pleas,
disciplinary actions or license denials in Wyoming and any
other jurisdiction;

(iii) Any civil action brought against the
operator or establishment; and

(iv) Any other information required by
commission rules.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(d) If the commission denies an application or
intends to revoke or suspend a license or permit issued
under this article, it shall notify the applicant, licensee
or permittee in writing, stating the grounds for denial,
revocation or suspension and informing the person of a
right to submit, before not more than thirty (30) days, any
additional documentation relating to the grounds of denial,
revocation or suspension. Upon receiving any additional
documentation, the commission shall reconsider its decision
and inform the applicant before not more than twenty (20)
days of the result of the reconsideration. A denial of an
application under this article shall be subject to the
contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act.

ARTICLE 6
ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING

9-24-101 9-24-601. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter article:

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(i) "Cash equivalent" means an asset that is
convertible to cash and approved for use in connection with
online sports wagering. Approved cash equivalents include:

(A) Travelers checks;

(B) Foreign currency and coin;

(C) Certified checks, cashier's checks and
money orders;

(D) Personal checks and drafts;

(E) Digital, crypto and virtual currencies;

(F) Online and mobile payment systems that
support online money transfers;

(G) Credit cards and debit cards;

(H) Prepaid access instruments;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(J) Any other form of asset that is
convertible to cash approved by commission rules.

(ii) "Commission" means the Wyoming gaming
commission;

(iii) "Director" means the executive director of
the commission;

(xvi)(iv) "Critical component" means any part or
component of a mobile application or digital platform that:

(A) Records, stores, processes, shares,
transmits or receives sensitive information, including
validation numbers and personal identification numbers; or

(B) Stores the results or the current
status of a patron's wager with an online sports wagering
operator.

(iv)(v) "Fantasy sports contest" means a
simulated game or contest with an entry fee that meets all
of the following conditions:
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(A) No fantasy sports contest team is
composed entirely of individual contestants who are members
of the same real world sports team;

(B) Each prize and award or the value of
all prizes and awards offered to winning fantasy sports
contest players is made known to the fantasy sports contest
players in advance of the fantasy sports contest;

(C) Each winning outcome reflects the
relative knowledge and skill of the fantasy sports contest
players and is determined by the aggregated statistical
results of the performance of multiple individual
contestants who each fantasy sports contest player has
selected to form that player's fantasy sports contest team.
The individual performances of the individual contestants
in the fantasy sports contest directly correspond with the
actual performances of those contestants in a real world
sporting event in which those individuals participated;

(D) A winning outcome is not based on the
performance of a single real world sports team, any
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
combination of real world sports teams or a single
contestant in a real world sporting event, nor is it based
on the score or point spread of one (1) or more real world
sporting events;

(E) The fantasy sports contest does not
constitute or involve a slot machine or a fixed, commercial
electrical gaming device.

(v)(vi) "Fantasy sports contest player" means a
person who engages in selecting individual contestants to
comprise a team for a fantasy sports contest;

(xvii)(vii) "Key personnel" means any person
employed in an executive or supervisory capacity by a
license holder, permit holder or applicant and who is
authorized to make discretionary decisions that exhibit
influence or control over gaming operations;.

(vi)(viii) "Online sports wagering" means
engaging in sports wagering conducted by a sports wagering
operator through a sports wagering account over the
internet by use of a computer, digital platform or mobile
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
application on a mobile device, any of which uses
communications technology to accept sports wagers or any
system or method of electronic sports wagering approved by
commission rules. "Online sports wagering" shall not
include or be conducted from any physical location created
by a sports wagering operator or vendor for a patron to
physically visit to place a wager;

(vii)(ix) "Online sports wagering revenue" means
the total of all wagers placed by patrons with an online
sports wagering operator, excluding the actual dollar value
of free wagers and promotional play provided, minus all
payments to patrons and minus any applicable federal excise
taxes. Payments to patrons include all payments of cash,
cash equivalents, merchandise and any other thing of value;

(viii)(x) "Patron" means a person who places an
online sports wagering wager;

(ix)(xi) "Prohibited sports wager" means:

(A) A wager involving any sporting event or
other event where the majority of contestants or athletes
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
in the sporting event are under the age of eighteen (18)
years;

(B) Any wagering category not authorized by
law or commission rules adopted in compliance with law.

(x)(xii) "Qualified gaming entity" means a
gaming entity that offers online sports wagering through
computers, digital platforms or mobile applications in not
less than three (3) jurisdictions in the United States
pursuant to a state regulatory structure;

(xi)(xiii) "Sporting event" means any
professional sports event or athletic event, any Olympic or
international sports event or athletic event, any amateur
sports event or athletic event, any collegiate sports event
or athletic event, electronic sports, or any portion
thereof, including the individual performance statistics of
contestants or athletes in sports events, athletic events
or a combination of sports and athletic events, or any
other event approved by commission rules;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(xii)(xiv) "Sports wagering" means the business
of accepting wagers from patrons on sporting events through
online sports wagering. "Sports wagering" wagers include
single game bets, teaser bets, parlays, over-under,
moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in-game wagering,
in-play bets, proposition bets and straight bets. "Sports
wagering" shall not include any of the following:

(A) Activities other than online sports
wagering that are exempted from criminal penalties under
W.S. 6-7-101 through 6-7-104;

(B) Activities outside of this chapter
article authorized or regulated by the commission;

(C) Lotteries authorized by law;

(D) Fantasy sports contests;

(E) Prohibited sports wagers.

(xiii)(xv) "Sports wagering account" means a
financial record established by a sports wagering operator
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
for an individual patron into which the patron may deposit
and from which the patron may withdraw funds for sports
wagering and other purchases, and into which the sports
wagering operator may credit winnings or other amounts due
to that patron or authorized by that patron. In compliance
with any other applicable law, a sports wagering account
may be established electronically through an approved
mobile application or digital platform;

(xiv)(xvi) "Sports wagering operator" means any
qualified gaming entity authorized by the commission to
accept online sports wagers;

(xv)(xvii) "Sports wagering vendor" means a
vendor that provides services to a sports wagering operator
that the sports wagering operator uses to accept online
sports wagers, including geolocation services, know your
customer services, payment processors, server host
providers, integrity monitoring services, cyber security
services and data providers.;

9-24-102 9-24-602. Online sports wagering regulation;
rulemaking.
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(a) The commission shall regulate online sports
wagering and sports wagering operators and vendors.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules to
implement this chapter article. The rules the commission
promulgates shall establish standards and procedures for
online sports wagering and associated sports wagering
systems. The rules shall include:

(i) Governance of the conduct of online sports
wagering and the system of wagering associated with online
sports wagering, including all of the following:

(A) Terms and conditions for online sports
wagering that are compliant with all applicable federal
laws;

(B) Identification of the sporting events
upon which online sports wagers may be accepted and methods
of play;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(C) The manner in which online sports
wagers are received and payoffs are remitted;

(D) Procedures for managing and resolving
suspected cheating, sports wagering irregularities and
complaints;

(E) A requirement that for a patron to make
a lawful wager the patron must be physically present in the
state when making the wager unless otherwise authorized by
the commission;

(F) A requirement for each sports wagering
operator to use a geolocation system to ensure that a
patron making an online sports wager is physically present
in the state when making the wager unless otherwise
authorized by the commission;

(G) Internal controls for all aspects of
online sports wagering, including procedures for system
integrity, system security, operations and accounting;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(H) Operational controls for online gaming
accounts;

(J) Procedures to ensure that sports
wagering operators do not offer prohibited sports wagers.

(ii) Establishing the method for calculating
online sports wagering revenue and standards for the
counting and recording of cash and cash equivalents
received in the conduct of online sports wagering, to
include methods for ensuring that internal controls are
followed, financial records are maintained and audits are
conducted;

(iii) Reasonable minimum qualifications for
sports wagering operators;

(iv) Any other matters necessary for overseeing
online sports wagering and sports wagering operators and
vendors.

(c) In promulgating rules pursuant to this section
article, the commission shall examine the regulations
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
implemented in other states where online sports wagering is
conducted and shall, as far as practicable, adopt a similar
regulatory framework to maximize revenue generated for the
state.

9-24-103 9-24-603. Permits; licenses; fees;
application.

(a) A sports wagering operator shall possess a permit
issued by the commission to accept online sports wagers. No
person shall accept online sports wagers without holding a
valid permit issued by the commission.

(b) A qualified gaming entity applying for a sports
wagering operator permit shall do so on a uniform
application furnished by the commission. The fee for both
an initial application and renewal application shall be two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00). The application
shall require an applicant, at a minimum, to provide:

(i) The full name, current address and contact
information of the applicant;

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(ii) Disclosure of each person who has control
of the applicant as described in subsection (g) of this
section;

(iii) The applicant's fingerprints and the
fingerprints of individuals identified in subsection (g) of
this section considered to have control of an applicant or
permit holder;

(iv) Allowance for the commission to obtain
fingerprints and to conduct a national criminal history
record check of the applicant, each individual disclosed
under subsection (g) of this section and each person
required to be licensed under subsections (p) and (q) of
this section in accordance with procedures established by
the commission. This subsection shall not require an
applicant or individual who has submitted to a criminal
background check in this or any other state within the
twelve (12) months before submitting the application to
resubmit to another criminal background check provided that
the applicant or individual submits the results of the
previous criminal background check and affirms that there
has been no material change in the criminal history since
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
the time of the criminal background check. The cost of the
criminal history record background check shall be paid
using a portion of the applicant's application fee;

(v) Other information and permissions as
requested by the commission;

(vi) For the applicant and each person disclosed
under subsection (g) of this section, a record of previous
issuances and denials of any gambling related license or
application under Wyoming statutes or in any other
jurisdiction in the United States;

(vii) Any additional information required by
commission rules.

(c) The commission shall charge a permit fee of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for an initial
sports wagering operator permit. An initial permit and any
renewal permit shall each be valid for five (5) years. The
commission shall charge a fee of fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00) for a sports wagering operator permit renewal.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(d) A sports wagering vendor shall possess a permit
issued by the commission to conduct business in the state.
No person shall provide vendor services to a sports
wagering operator without holding a valid permit issued by
the commission.

(e) The commission shall charge a fee of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00) for an initial sports wagering vendor
permit. An initial permit and any renewal permit shall each
be valid for five (5) years. The commission shall charge a
fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for a sports
wagering vendor permit renewal.

(f) Sports wagering operator fees, sports wagering
vendor permit fees and license fees charged pursuant to
subsections (c), (e), (p) and (q) of this section shall be
deposited in the sports wagering account, which is hereby
created. Subject to legislative appropriation, amounts
within the account may be used by the commission for all
expenses incurred in administering this chapter article. On
a quarterly basis, the commission shall transfer amounts
within the account in excess of five hundred thousand
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
dollars ($500,000.00) to the state treasurer for credit to
the general fund.

(g) The following persons are considered to have
control of a sports wagering operator permit applicant or
permit holder:

(i) Each holding company, parent company or
subsidiary company of the applicant or permit holder;

(ii) Each person, except for a bank or other
licensed lending institution that holds a mortgage or other
lien acquired in the ordinary course of business, who owns
fifteen percent (15%) or more of a corporate applicant or
permit holder and has the ability to:

(A) Control the activities of the corporate
applicant or permit holder; or

(B) Elect a majority of the board of
directors of that corporate applicant or permit holder.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(iii) Each person associated with a noncorporate
applicant or permit holder who directly or indirectly holds
a beneficial or proprietary interest in the noncorporate
applicant's or permit holder's business operations or who
the commission otherwise determines has the ability to
control the noncorporate applicant or permit holder;

(iv) Key personnel of an applicant or permit
holder, including any executive, employee or agent having
the power to exercise ultimate decision making authority
over the applicant's or permit holder's sports wagering
operations in this state.

(h) The commission shall, not more than ninety (90)
days after the date of receipt of an application for a
permit or license or application for renewal of a permit or
license under this section article, either:

(i) Issue the permit or license; or

(ii) Deny the application based on the grounds
that the applicant failed to qualify as provided by
subsection (j) of this section.
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(j) The commission shall deny an application under
this article upon finding any of the following:

(i) The applicant or permit holder has been
convicted of, forfeited bail on or pleaded guilty to:

(A) A crime involving theft, dishonesty or
fraud;

(B) Bribery or unlawfully influencing a
public official;

(C) A felony crime involving physical harm
to a person; or

(D) Any other crime identified by rule of
the commission that negatively impacts the applicant's
credibility or the security, integrity or fairness of
online sports wagering.

(ii) The applicant tampered with submitted
documentation or concealed, failed to disclose or otherwise
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
attempted to mislead the commission with respect to any
material fact contained in the application or contained in
any other information required of or submitted by an
applicant to the commission;

(iii) The applicant, license holder or permit
holder failed or refused to cooperate in the investigation
of a crime related to gambling, corruption of a public
official or any organized criminal activity;

(iv) The applicant, license holder or permit
holder has intentionally not disclosed the existence or
identity of other persons who have control of the applicant
or permit holder as required by this section;

(v) The applicant, license holder or permit
holder has had a permit or license revoked by any
government authority responsible for the regulation of
sports wagering;

(vi) The applicant, license holder or permit
holder has not demonstrated financial responsibility
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
sufficient to adequately meet the requirements of this
chapter article, as specified by rule of the commission; or

(vii) The applicant, license holder or permit
holder has not met the requirements of this section, any
other provision of this chapter article, commission rules
or any applicable federal laws.

(k) Given a sufficient number of applicants, at any
one (1) time the commission shall issue not less than five
(5) sports wagering operator permits to applicants that
satisfy the requirements under this chapter article. If an
insufficient number of applicants apply for a sports
wagering operator permit, this provision shall not be
interpreted to direct the commission to issue a permit to
an unqualified applicant.

(m) The commission shall issue a permit to a sports
wagering vendor that is currently operating in good
standing in a similar role in at least three (3)
jurisdictions in the United States under a state regulatory
structure and that has paid all required fees under
subsection (e) of this section.
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(n) Permit holders and license holders under this
article shall have an ongoing obligation to disclose in
writing any material change in the information provided in
the application to the commission, including:

(i) Changes to names and contact information;

(ii) Arrests, convictions, guilty pleas,
disciplinary actions or license denials in Wyoming or any
other jurisdiction;

(iii) Any civil action brought against the
permit holder or license holder; and

(iv) Any other information specified by rule of
the commission.

(o) If the commission denies an application or
intends to revoke or suspend a permit or license issued
under this article, it shall notify the applicant, licensee
or permittee in writing, stating the grounds for denial,
revocation or suspension and informing the person of a
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
right to submit, within not more than thirty (30) days, any
additional documentation relating to the grounds for
denial, revocation or suspension. Upon receiving any
additional documentation, the commission shall reconsider
its decision and inform the applicant of its decision
within not more than twenty (20) days of the submission of
information for reconsideration. A denial of an application
or a revocation or suspension of a permit or license under
this article shall be subject to the contested case
procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

(p) Key personnel of an applicant, license holder or
permit holder who may exercise ultimate decision making
authority over the applicant's, permit holder's or license
holder's online sports wagering operations in this state
shall be licensed by the commission. The commission shall
charge a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for an
initial license and renewal application under this
subsection. An initial license and any renewal license
issued under this subsection shall each be valid for five
(5) years.

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(q) Any employee of an applicant, license holder or
permit holder who is not subject to licensure under
subsection (p) of this section and who is authorized to
change and is capable of changing play or outcome of wagers
through the deployment of code to production for any
critical component of the applicant's, permit holder's or
license holder's mobile application or digital platform in
this state shall be licensed by the commission. The
commission shall charge a fee of two hundred fifty dollars
($250.00) for an initial license and renewal application
under this subsection. An initial license and any renewal
license issued under this subsection shall each be valid
for five (5) years.

9-24-106 9-24-606. Penalties; compliance.

(a) Any person who knowingly accepts online sports
wagers or otherwise operates a business of sports wagering
and does not possess a valid permit or license issued by
the commission under this chapter article shall be subject
to the following, in addition to any penalty imposed under
W.S. 6-7-102:

HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
(i) For a first offense, a civil penalty of
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00);

(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, a civil
penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).

(b) When a series of similar events result in a
violation under this chapter article or commission rules,
those events that occur within the same month shall be
treated as one offense and not separate and distinct
offenses.

(c) The commission shall develop a compliance program
that includes establishing procedures to review online
sports wagering and related activities occurring in the
state to ensure compliance with and enforcement of this
chapter article. The program shall include review and
evaluation of the conduct of:

(i) Sports wagering operators, sports wagering
vendors, qualified gaming entities, patrons and any other
person permitted or authorized to engage in activities
under this chapter article; and
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065

(ii) Persons operating without a valid permit or
license under this chapter article, engaging in activities
not authorized or regulated under this chapter article or
pursuing or engaging in activities otherwise in violation
of this chapter article.

Section 4. W.S. 9-24-104 and 9-24-105 are renumbered
as 9-24-604 and 9-24-605, 11-25-101 is renumbered as
9-24-202, 11-25-103 is renumbered as 9-24-203, 11-25-201
through 11-25-207 are renumbered as 9-24-403 through
9-24-409, 11-25-209 is renumbered as 9-24-411, 11-25-301
through 11-25-304 are renumbered as 9-24-502 through
9-24-505 and 11-25-306 is renumbered as 9-24-507.

Section 5. W.S. 6-7-101(a)(i), (iii)(D), (F), (N) and
(O) is repealed.

Section 6. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(ii) and (xv) through
(xxii), renumbered as 9-24-401(a)(ii) and (xv) through
(xxii) by this act, 11-25-104(a) through (c), (n) and (o),
renumbered as 9-24-402(a) through (c), (n) and (o) by this
HB0087

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0065
act and 11‑25‑208(b), renumbered as 9-24-410(b) by this act
are repealed.

Section 7. It is the intent of the legislature that
this act consolidates statutes related to the regulation of
gaming activities in the state of Wyoming by repealing,
creating, renumbering and amending statutes. Any other act
adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session
in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and
shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent
that such acts are in conflict with this act, except that
the provisions of such acts shall be incorporated by the
legislative service office into conforming or sequential
statute section numbers as are adopted in this act.

Section 8. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0087